Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 401.913 is amended to read:
401.913. (1) The office of State Resilience Officer is created in the  office of the Governor. The
office of State Resilience Officer shall direct, implement and coordinate [ seismic] hazard safety  and
resilience goal setting and state agency planning and preparation  to improve [ seismic] hazard safety
and resilience , including but not limited to planning and preparation for safety and resilience
during and after earthquake, tsunami,  wildfire, flooding and other natural or manmade
events.
(2) The State Resilience Officer shall lead statewide efforts to implement the Oregon
Resilience Plan, the Natural Hazard Mitigation Plan and other resilience plans adopted by the
state.
(3) The State Resilience Officer shall  lead executive branch agencies in continuity of op-
erations planning and continuity of government planning.
[(2)] (4) The Governor shall appoint an  individual to serve as the State Resilience Officer, sub-
ject to confirmation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
[(3)] (5)  The legislative branch of government and the judicial branch of government shall each
select an individual to monitor the effectiveness of [ seismic] hazard safety and resilience planning
in their branch.
Enrolled House Bill 2581 (HB 2581-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2581 (HB 2581-INTRO) Page 2